New York, session 2025-2026, S4553.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision c of section 14-103 of the administrative code 2 of the city of New York, as amended by chapter 755 of the laws of 1990, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 c. The commissioner may designate lieutenants as commanders of detec- 5 tive squads, and sergeants as supervisors of detective squads, who while 6 performing duty in such bureau and while so designated as commanders of 7 detective squads or supervisors of detective squads shall be paid such 8 salary as may be determined by the mayor. Any person who has received 9 permanent appointment as a lieutenant or sergeant and is temporarily 10 assigned to perform the duties of a commander of a detective squad or 11 supervisor of a detective squad shall, whenever such assignment exceeds 12 eighteen months in duration, be appointed as a lieutenant commander of a 13 detective squad or sergeant supervisor of a detective squad and receive 14 the compensation ordinarily paid to perform such duties. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05717-01-5